Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 51.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
72-2501
Nebraska Incentives
Fund; created; investment.

The Nebraska Incentives
Fund is created. Transfers may be made from the fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money
in the Nebraska Incentives Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 2008, LB914, § 24;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 51.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.